Idaho, session 2025, H0072.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 41-1315, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-1315. EXCEPTIONS TO DISCRIMINATION OR REBATE PROVISION -- LIFE OR
DISABILITY POLICIES, AND ANNUITY CONTRACTS. (1) Nothing in sections 41-1313
and 41-1314, Idaho Code, shall be construed as including within the defini-
tion of discrimination or rebates or illegal inducements any of the follow-
ing practices:
(1) (a) In the case of any contract of life insurance or life annuity,
paying bonuses to policy holders or otherwise abating their premiums in
whole or in part out of surplus accumulated from nonparticipating in-
surance, provided that any such bonuses or abatement of premiums shall
be fair and equitable to policy holders.;
(2) (b) In the case of life insurance policies issued on the debit plan,
making allowance to policy holders who have continuously for a speci-
fied period made premium payments directly to an office of the insurer
in an amount which that fairly represents the saving in collection ex-
pense.;
(3) (c) Readjustment of Readjusting the rate of premium for a group in-
surance policy based on the loss or expense experience thereunder, at
the end of the first or any subsequent policy year of insurance thereun-
der, which may be made retroactive only for such policy year.;
(4) (d) Issuing life or disability insurance policies on a salary
savings, bank draft, preauthorized check or payroll deduction plan or
other similar plan at a reduced rate reasonably related to the savings
made by use of such plan.;
(5) (e) Issuance of Issuing life or disability insurance policies or
annuity contracts at rates less than the usual rates of premiums for
such policies or contracts, or modification of premium or rate based on
amount of insurance; but any such issuance or modification shall not
result in reduction in premium or rate in excess of savings in adminis-
tration and issuance expenses reasonably attributable to such policies
or contracts.;
(f) Engaging in an arrangement that would not violate the provisions of
12 U.S.C. 1972, as interpreted by the board of governors of the federal
reserve system, or 12 U.S.C. 1464(q); or
(g) Insurers or producers offering or providing, by or through employ-
ees, affiliates, or third-party representatives, value-added products


or services at no or reduced cost when such products or services are not
specified in the policy of insurance if:
(i) The product or service relates to the insurance coverage and
is primarily designed to:
1. Provide loss mitigation or loss control;
2. Reduce claim costs or claim settlement costs;
3. Provide education about liability risks or risk of loss
to persons or property;
4. Monitor or assess risk, identify sources of risk, or de-
velop strategies for eliminating or reducing risk;
5. Enhance health;
6. Enhance financial wellness through items such as educa-
tion or financial planning services;
7. Provide post-loss services;
8. Incentivize behavioral changes to improve the health or
reduce the risk of death or disability of a policyholder,
potential policyholder, certificate holder, potential cer-
tificate holder, insured, potential insured, or applicant;
or
9. Assist in the administration of the employee or retiree
benefit insurance coverage;
(ii) The cost to the insurer or producer offering the product or
service to any given customer is reasonable in comparison to that
customer's premiums or insurance coverage for the policy class;
(iii) The customer is provided with contact information to assist
the customer with questions regarding the product or service; and
(iv) The availability of the value-added product or service is
based on documented objective criteria and offered in a manner
that is not unfairly discriminatory. The documented criteria must
be maintained by the insurer or producer and produced on request by
the department of insurance.
(2) If an insurer or producer does not have sufficient evidence but has
a good-faith belief that a product or service meets the criteria provided in
subsection (1)(g) of this section, the insurer or producer may provide the
product or service in a manner that is not unfairly discriminatory as part
of a pilot or testing program for no more than one (1) year. An insurer or
producer shall notify the department of insurance of such a pilot or testing
program offered to consumers in this state prior to launching and may proceed
with the program unless the department of insurance objects within twenty-
one (21) days of notice.
(3) The director of the department of insurance may adopt regulations,
subject to legislative approval, when implementing the permitted practices
set forth in this section to ensure consumer protection. Such regulations,
consistent with applicable law, may address issues including but not limited
to consumer data protections and privacy, consumer disclosure, and unfair
discrimination.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.